Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 1. Buffalo, Musk Oxen, Elk, and Elephants.

Sec. 16.40.010.
Disposition of surplus buffalo and musk oxen.

Whenever it is determined by the department that a surplus exists in the herds of buffalo and musk oxen under its control, the department may, under regulations adopted by it, grant the surplus or portions of it to persons, groups, associations, partnerships, or corporations for the purpose of raising and breeding the animals as domestic stock for commercial purposes, or for scientific and educational purposes.
A person, group, association, partnership, or corporation may receive animals only after proving to the satisfaction of the department

intent to raise and breed the animals; and

possession of facilities for maintaining the animals under positive control.

History.

(§ 1 ch 15 SLA 1962)

Administrative Code. —

For use of game, see 5 AAC 92, art. 7.

Collateral references. —

35 Am. Jur. 2d, Fish and Game, § 56.

Sec. 16.40.020.
Sale of meat.

The sale of buffalo or musk oxen meat resulting from the slaughter of animals obtained under AS

16.40.010

, or their offspring is authorized.

History.

(§ 2 ch 15 SLA 1962)

Sec. 16.40.030.
Information required.

The recipient of animals obtained under AS

16.40.010

shall furnish the department the information the department requests regarding the status of the animals or their offspring.

History.

(§ 3 ch 15 SLA 1962)

Administrative Code. —

For use of game, see 5 AAC 92, art. 7.

Collateral references. —

36 C.J.S., Game, § 54 et seq.

Sec. 16.40.050.
Capture or release of elk.

[Repealed, § 5 ch 41 SLA 2000.]

[Repealed, § 5 ch 41 SLA 2000.]

A live elk may not be captured from the wild or released into the wild without an appropriate license or permit from the department.

[Repealed, § 5 ch 41 SLA 2000.]

[Repealed, § 5 ch 41 SLA 2000.]

History.

(§ 3 ch 88 SLA 1987; am §§ 4, 5 ch 41 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

16.05.331

. Renumbered in 1992.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to elk farming, see AS

03.05.075

.

Sec. 16.40.060.
Elephant permit.

The commissioner may issue a permit, subject to reasonable conditions established by the commissioner, to possess, import, or export an elephant. A permit may be issued only to a person who proves to the satisfaction of the commissioner that the person

intends to exhibit the animal commercially;

possesses facilities to maintain the animal under positive control and humane conditions; and

maintains personal injury and property damage insurance in an amount established by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1995)